Mississippi, session 2026, SB2360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Secretary of State shall create a publicly accessible registry of entities that are contracted with a governmental entity to perform a governmental function and are subject to the rights and remedies of this chapter. (2)  Any private entities that are contracted with a governmental entity to perform a governmental function and are subject to the rights and remedies of this chapter shall register with the Secretary of State. (3)  Any entity that is required to register under this section shall post notice that it is subject to the rights and remedies of this chapter on its public website and printed materials. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified within Title 11, Chapter 46, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.